Hawaii statutes.
[§163D-33] Installment purchase agreements;
interest payment. (a) The legislature may authorize the corporation to
negotiate installment purchase agreements for the acquisition of specific
parcels of land for the protection of agricultural lands, public land banking,
or the promotion of farm ownership and diversified agriculture. The
installment purchase agreements shall be structured pursuant to the
requirements of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, to defer
recognition of capital gain until all of the purchase price is paid. The
agreement shall include provisions for the periodic payment of a portion of the
purchase price with the remainder of the purchase price paid at the end of the
term of the agreement. The legislature shall authorize the purchase of United States Treasury zero coupon bonds for the installment purchase agreement with a
maturity date equal to the term of the agreement.

(b) The interest rate paid on the installment
purchase agreement shall be not less than the interest rate on the zero coupon
bonds at the closing of the agreement or eight per cent, whichever is higher.

(c) The corporation shall make semi-annual
interest payments on the outstanding balance of the installment purchase
agreement purchase price. [L 2008, c 234, pt of §6]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next